hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.aff
SFX z N 52
SFX z бу псін [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:псін:2
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:сін:1
SFX z гу ксін [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:ксін:2
SFX z ғу қсін [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:қсін:2
SFX z ду тсін [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:тсін:2
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:сін:1
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:сін:1
SFX z бу псын [аоуұыэ]бу sf:псын:2
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]ву sf:сын:1
SFX z гу ксын [аоуұыэ]гу sf:ксын:2
SFX z ғу қсын [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:қсын:2
SFX z ду тсын [аоуұыэ]ду sf:тсын:2
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]жу sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]зу sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]ку sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]қу sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]лу sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]му sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]ну sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]һу sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]пу sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]ру sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]су sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]ту sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]у sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]фу sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]ху sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]цу sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]чу sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]шу sf:сын:1
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]щу sf:сын:1
SFX z ю йсін [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йсін:1
SFX z ю йсын [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йсын:1
