hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.dic
адасу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
азынау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
айтылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
алабұрту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
албырау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
алыстау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
анонстау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
арбалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
артылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
аспаптау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
аталу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
аудандастыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ауырыңқырау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ашыту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
аяқталу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ақшалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
аңғалақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
базаршылау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
байқау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
балталау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
барылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
басыну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
батырсыну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бағдарламалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бақыраю/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
безігу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бекемдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
берілу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бипыңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бойкүйездену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
борау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
боршалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бсу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бурылдану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
былпию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бырысу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
білектеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бітеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бүктеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бүрмелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бұйымтайлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бұлталаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бұралақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бұрқату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бәйектену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бөгелу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
графалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дардию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дестелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дызылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дәлдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
егесу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
елігу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ерлеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
еңкеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жайраңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жалпылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жанартау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жарылқау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жауыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жеделдету/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жеңу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жоғарылату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жырбақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жұлықтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жөтелу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
зу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
илену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
иіндеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кежірлену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
келтірмеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кернеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кешу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кристалдану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кісімсіну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
күлмеңдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
күркілдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
көжектеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
көндіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
көңілдену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
майдандастыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
майқандалу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мамандандыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
марғаулау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
матырылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
маңдайлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мекерлену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
миақтату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
молығу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мылжыңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мінездеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мүшелену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мұңдану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мөңку/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
образдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ойқастату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ордаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
оттығу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
оқырану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
паңсу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
рақаттау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
рәсуалану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
салпию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
саранау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
саусау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
саңлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
селсоқтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сету/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сойқандау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
состию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
суылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сылтаурату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сыртылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сықылдану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сүйеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сүртіну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сұқтану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
табиғаттану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
талтаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
таралу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тағайындау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
терлеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тойлату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
толықтану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
томырықтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
торалту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тосыраю/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тоқмейілдену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тоңқаю/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тыжырынту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тыныстату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тырлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тығыздау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тыңдату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тілу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түзесу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түймештету/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түйірлену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түндіктету/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түртпектету/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түсінілу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тұжырымдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тұнжырату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тұсалыну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тұшынту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
төбелесқойлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
төмпештелу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
төселіңкіреу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
улау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
хабарландыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шабуылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шайқалаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шалу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шамалану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шапшаңдатылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шарпысу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шатылдыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шашақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шақшаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шаңқылдаттыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шемендену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шетінеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шиферлеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шолжыңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шоштию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шынжау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шүйіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шұқыну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ыбыржу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ыржию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ыю/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ілгіштену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ішу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қазақшалану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қайыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қалтаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қамығу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қарайласу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қарбаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қартаңсыну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қасаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қатыгездеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қаусау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қашықтаңқырау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қақсау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қидалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қитығу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қодықтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қойғызу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қонақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қорпылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қосарлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қоқыраю/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қурайлану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қырсаулау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қырқырау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қытықталу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
құжылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
құлпыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
құрандасу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
құтыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
үйрену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
үлкенсу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
үру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
үшкіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ұлу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ұсынылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
әдеттену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
өбектеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
өлусіреу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
өту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
